Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2761.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as "The Rhode Island Business
Climate Reform Act."
SECTION 2. Sections 7-1.2-711 and 7-1.2-1408 of the General Laws in Chapter 7-1.2
entitled "Rhode Island Business Corporation Act" are hereby amended to read as follows:
7-1.2-711. Actions by shareholders.
(a) Definitions. In this section:
(1) “Derivative proceeding” means a civil suit in the right of a domestic corporation or, to
the extent provided in subsection (h) of this section, in the right of a foreign corporation.
(2) “Shareholder” includes a beneficial owner whose shares are held in a voting trust or
held by a nominee on the beneficial owner's behalf.
(b) Standing. A shareholder may not commence or maintain a derivative proceeding unless
the shareholder:
(i) Was a shareholder of the corporation at the time of the act or omission complained of
or became a shareholder through transfer by operation of law from one who was a shareholder at
that time; and
(ii) Fairly and adequately represents the interests of the corporation in enforcing the right
of the corporation.
(c) Demand. No shareholder may commence a derivative proceeding until:

(1) A written demand had been made upon the corporation to take suitable action; and
(2) Ninety (90) days have expired from the date the demand was made unless the
shareholder has earlier been notified that the demand has been rejected by the corporation or unless
irreparable injury to the corporation would result by waiting for the expiration of the ninety (90)
day period.
(d) Stay of proceedings. If the corporation commences an inquiry into the allegations made
in the demand or complaint, the court may stay any derivative proceeding for such period as the
court deems appropriate.
(e) Dismissal.
(1) On motion by the corporation, the court shall dismiss a derivative proceeding if one of
the groups specified in subsection (e)(2) or (e)(6) has determined in good faith after conducting a
reasonable inquiry upon which its conclusions are based that the maintenance of the derivate
proceedings is not in the best interests of the corporation.
(2) Unless a panel is appointed pursuant to subsection (e)(6), the determination in
subsection (e)(1) must be made by:
(i) A majority vote of independent directors present at a meeting of the board of directors
if the independent directors constitute a quorum; or
(ii) A majority vote of a committee consisting of two (2) or more independent directors
appointed by majority vote of independent directors present at a meeting of the board of directors,
whether or not such independent directors constituted a quorum.
(3) None of the following by itself causes a director to be considered not independent for
purposes of this section:
(i) The nomination or election of the directors or persons who are defendants in the
derivative proceedings or against whom action is demanded;
(ii) The naming of the director as a defendant in the derivative proceeding or as a person
against whom action is demanded; or
(iii) The approval by the director of the act being challenged in the derivative proceeding
or demand if the act resulted in no personal benefit to the director.
(4) If a derivative proceeding is commenced after a determination has been made rejecting
a demand by a shareholder, the complaint must allege with particularity facts establishing either
(A) that a majority of the board of directors did not consist of independent directors at the time the
determination was made, or (B) that the requirements of subsection (e)(1) of this section have not
been met.
(5) If a majority of the board of directors does not consist of independent directors at the
LC005382 - Page 2 of 25

time the determination is made, the corporation has the burden of proving that the requirements of
subsection (e)(1) have been met. If a majority of the board of directors consists of independent
directors at the time the determination is made, the plaintiff has the burden of proving that the
requirements of subsection (e)(1) have not been met.
(6) The court may appoint a panel of one or more independent persons upon motion by the
corporation to make a determination whether the maintenance of the derivative proceeding is in the
best interests of the corporation. In such case, the plaintiff has the burden of proving that the
requirements of subsection (e)(1) have not been met.
(f) Discontinuance or settlement. A derivative proceeding may not be discontinued or
settled without the court's approval. If the court determines that a proposed discontinuance or
settlement will substantially affect the interests of the corporation's shareholders or a class of
shareholders, the court shall direct that notice be given to the shareholders affected.
(g) Payment of expenses. On termination of the derivative proceeding the court may:
(1) Order the corporation to pay the plaintiff's reasonable expenses (including counsel fees)
incurred in the proceeding if it finds that the proceeding has resulted in a substantial benefit to the
corporation;
(2) Order the plaintiff to pay any defendant's reasonable expenses (including counsel fees)
incurred in defending the proceeding if it finds that the proceeding was commenced or maintained
without reasonable cause or for an improper purpose; or
(3) Order a party to pay an opposing party's reasonable expenses (including counsel fees)
incurred because of the filing of a pleading, motion or other paper, if it finds that the pleading,
motion or other paper was not well grounded in fact, after reasonable inquiry, or warranted by
existing law or a good faith argument for the extension, modification or reversal of existing law
and was interposed for an improper purpose, such as to harass or cause unnecessary delay or
needless increase in the cost of litigation.
(h) Applicability to foreign corporations. In any derivative proceeding in the right of a
foreign corporation, the matters covered by this subchapter are governed by the laws of the
jurisdiction of incorporation of the foreign corporation except for subsections (d), (f), and (g) of
this section.
(i) Imposition of minimum ownership requirements for initiating derivative actions. On
and after July 1, 2026, the following requirements shall apply to any shareholder derivative action
brought pursuant to the provisions of this section:
(1) Publicly traded entities and for-profit private entities with five hundred (500) or more
equity owners or shareholders, and that have elected the statutory business judgment rule may
LC005382 - Page 3 of 25

impose a minimum ownership threshold of up to five percent (5%) of the outstanding equity for
owners to initiate derivative actions.
(2) Attorneys' fees awarded in these derivative actions shall be limited by specifically
disqualifying mere disclosure-only settlements as "substantial benefits" for the purpose of such
awards, regardless of the materiality of the disclosures.
7-1.2-1408. Registered office and registered agent of foreign corporation.
(a) Each foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state must shall have
and continuously maintain in this state a registered agent, who is either:
(1) An individual resident in this state; or
(2) A corporation, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, limited liability
company, and in each case either domestic or one authorized to transact business in this state.
Provided, on and after July 1, 2026, the secretary of state may serve as a registered agent for a
foreign corporation or a foreign limited liability company.
(b) Foreign corporations who are the holders of mortgages on real estate located within this
state which do not maintain the loan documentation and records within the state shall authorize the
registered agent to accept mortgage discharge payment and to issue a discharge of the mortgages
upon the payment.
SECTION 3. Chapter 7-1.2 of the General Laws entitled "Rhode Island Business
Corporation Act" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following sections:
7-1.2-815. Business judgment rule.
(a) Unless the corporate or controlling documents for an entity subject to the provisions of
this chapter specify a different standard for the conduct of a director or manager of the entity, then
it shall be conclusively presumed that the entity has elected for application of the business judgment
rule to govern the conduct of decisions made by directors or managers as provided pursuant to the
provisions of subsection (b) of this section.
(b) A director or manager who makes a business judgment for an entity electing application
of the business judgment rule pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be presumed to have
satisfied the requirements of this chapter if all of the following conditions are satisfied:
(1) The director or manager has acted in good faith;
(2) The director or manager does not have an interest in the subject of the business
judgment;
(3) The director or manager was informed with respect to the subject of the business
judgment to the extent the director or manager believes was appropriate, and that belief was
reasonable, under the circumstances; and
LC005382 - Page 4 of 25

(4) The director or manager believes that the business judgment was in the best interests of
the corporation or entity and its shareholders or equity owners, and that belief is rational.
(c) A person challenging the conduct of a director or manager as a breach under this chapter
has the burden of proving failure of the director or manager to satisfy the requirements of subsection
(a) of this section and, if that burden is sustained, of proving the director's or manager's failure to
satisfy the requirements under any provision of this chapter, and in a damage action under any
section of this chapter, the burden of proving that the breach was the proximate cause of damage
suffered by the corporation or its shareholders or equity owners.
(d) For the purpose of this section, a director or manager has an interest in a transaction or
conduct that is the subject of a business judgment only if any of the following conditions are
satisfied:
(1) The director, or manager or an associate of the director or manager, is a party to the
transaction or conduct;
(2) The director or manager or an associate of the director or manager has a material
pecuniary interest in the transaction or conduct other than usual and customary directors' or
managers' fees and benefits, of which the director or manager knows or should be aware, that would
reasonably be expected to affect the director's or manager's judgment in a manner adverse to the
corporation or entity or its shareholders or equity owners; or
(3) The director or manager is subject to a controlling influence by a party to the transaction
or conduct, other than the corporation or entity or by a person who has a material pecuniary interest
in the transaction or conduct, and that controlling influence could reasonably be expected to affect
the director's or manager's judgment with respect to the transaction or conduct in a manner adverse
to the corporation or entity or its shareholders or equity owners.
(e) As used in this section, "associate" means any of the following persons:
(1) The spouse of the director; a child, grandchild, parent, sibling, uncle, aunt, nephew,
niece, step-child, stepparent, or step-sibling of the director, including adoptive relationships, and
the spouse of such a person; a mother-in-law, father-in law, brother-in-law, or sister-in-law of the
director; a person, other than a domestic employee, having the same home as the director; and a
trust or estate of which the director or a person designated in this subsection is a substantial
beneficiary.
(2) A trust, estate, incompetent, conservatee, or minor of which the director is a fiduciary.
(3) A person with respect to whom the director or manager has a business or financial
relationship other than a person described in subsection (d)(1) or (d)(2) of this section, but if and
only if the relationship would reasonably be expected to affect the director's or manager's judgment
LC005382 - Page 5 of 25

with respect to the transaction or conduct in question in a manner adverse to the corporation or
entity or its shareholders or equity owners. For the purpose of this subsection, the following
presumptions affecting the burden of proof apply:
(i) The director's or manager's judgment is presumed not to be adversely affected solely
because the director or manager is a director or principal manager of the business organization.
(ii) The director's or manager's judgment is presumed not to be adversely affected if the
director or manager is the beneficial owner or record holder of not more than ten percent (10%) of
any class of equity interest.
(iii) The director's or manager's judgment is presumed to be adversely affected if the
director or manager is the beneficial or record holder, other than in a custodial capacity, of more
than ten percent (10%) of any class of equity interest.
7-1.2-1806. Advanced determinations of director independence.
Publicly traded corporations and for-profit corporations that elected the statutory business
judgment rule may petition Rhode Island superior courts to hold an evidentiary hearing to
determine the independence of a special committee of directors tasked with reviewing related party
transactions, such as those involving the corporation and a controlling shareholder, director, or
officer. Prior to the evidentiary hearing, the corporation shall notify each of its shareholders to
provide them with the opportunity to participate in the proceeding. Once the superior court validates
the independence of the committee, that decision shall be binding absent facts, which were not
presented to the court, that prove one or more directors is not independent and disinterested with
respect to the applicable transaction.
7-1.2-1807. Waiver of class-by-class voting.
A corporation organized under the provisions of this chapter may include language in its
governing documents allowing the corporation to waive class-by-class share voting in certain
circumstances, permitting all classes of its stock to vote as a single class.
7-1.2-1808. Shielded communications.
Shareholders, members, and partners of a corporation organized under the provisions of
this chapter shall not be entitled to review certain communications, to include emails, text
messages, social media posts, and similar electronic communication, unless the communication
effectuates an official action of the entity. Publicly traded entities and corporate entities that elect
the statutory business judgment rule may deny inspection demands if the entity is involved, or
expects to be involved, in a derivative proceeding or other litigation proceeding involving the
entity. Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting a court of competent jurisdiction from
ordering the production or disclosure of any document of communication.
LC005382 - Page 6 of 25

SECTION 4. Section 7-16-11 of the General Laws in Chapter 7-16 entitled "The Rhode
Island Limited Liability Company Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
7-16-11. Resident agent.
(a) Each domestic or foreign registered limited liability company shall have a resident agent
for service of process on the limited liability company who shall be either:
(1) An individual resident of this state; or
(2) A corporation, limited partnership, or limited liability company, and in each case either
domestic or one authorized to transact business in this state. Provided, on and after July 1, 2026,
the secretary of state may serve as a resident agent for a foreign limited liability company. Provided
further, that on and after July 1, 2026, an entity applying to be a foreign limited liability company
in Rhode Island shall not be required to provide a certificate of good standing from their home or
domestic jurisdiction as part of the application process.
(b)(1) A domestic or foreign registered limited liability company may change its resident
agent or the address of its resident agent by filing with the secretary of state a statement signed by
any authorized person that authorizes the change.
(2) A change of a resident agent or address of the resident agent for a domestic or foreign
registered limited liability company under this subsection is effective when the secretary of state
accepts the statement for filing.
(c)(1) A resident agent that changes address in the state shall file with the secretary of state
a statement of the change of address signed by the resident agent or on the resident agent's behalf.
(2) The statement shall include:
(i) The name of the limited liability company for which the change is effective;
(ii) The old and new addresses of the resident agent; and
(iii) The date on which the change is effective.
(3) The change of address of the resident agent is effective when the secretary of state
accepts the statement for filing.
(d)(1) A resident agent may resign by filing with the secretary of state a counterpart or
photocopy of the signed resignation, together with a statement that the resignation has been
delivered or sent to the limited liability company.
(2) Unless a later time is specified in the resignation, it is effective thirty (30) days after it
is filed.
(e) The secretary of state is appointed the agent of the domestic limited liability company
for service of process if no resident agent has been appointed, if the resident agent's authority has
been revoked, or if the resident agent cannot be found or served following the exercise of reasonable
LC005382 - Page 7 of 25

diligence.
SECTION 5. Chapter 7-16 of the General Laws entitled "The Rhode Island Limited
Liability Company Act" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following sections:
7-16-78. Anonymous limited liability company filings.
(a) On and after July 1, 2026, entities may be formed and filed as anonymous limited
liability companies ("ALLC"). An ALLC filing will require the same filings as a traditional LLC,
but the names of members and managers shall not be required to be placed on public filings;
provided, however, the ALLC filing shall include the registered agent.
(b) Equity owners' or members' names shall be listed with an internal operating agreement
of the ALLC.
7-16-79. Rhode Island protected series limited liability company.
A limited liability company agreement may establish or provide for the establishment of
one or more designated series of members, managers, limited liability company interests or assets.
Any series may have separate rights, powers or duties with respect to specified property or
obligations of the limited liability company or profits and losses associated with specified property
or obligations, and any series may have a separate business purpose or investment objective. No
provision of this chapter shall be construed to limit the application of the principle of freedom of
contract to a series that is not a protected series or a registered series. Other than as specifically
provided for otherwise in this chapter 7 of title 16, a series may not merge, convert or consolidate.
7-16-80. Limitation of liability.
A limited liability company operating agreement may provide for the limitation or
elimination of any and all liabilities for breach of contract and breach of duties, including fiduciary
duties, of a member, manager or other person to a limited liability company or to another member
or manager or to another person that is a party to or is otherwise bound by a limited liability
company operating agreement; provided, that a limited liability company operating agreement may
not limit or eliminate liability for any act or omission that constitutes a bad faith violation of the
implied contractual covenant of good faith and fair dealing.
SECTION 6. Chapter 8-2 of the General Laws entitled "Superior Court" is hereby amended
by adding thereto the following sections:
8-2-41. Complex commercial litigation calendar.
(a) On and after July 1, 2027, there shall be a separate calendar for the administration and
determination of complex commercial litigation matters.
(b) Complex commercial litigation calendar. The presiding judge of the superior court shall
create a complex commercial litigation calendar ("CCLC") in superior court and shall assign
LC005382 - Page 8 of 25

personnel to the extent warranted to exclusively hear and decide all eligible complex commercial
litigation matters. The calendar shall be referred to as the "complex commercial litigation calendar."
(c) Eligible cases.
(1) Cases eligible for the this calendar shall include any case that includes a claim asserted
by any party either directly or by declaratory judgment with an amount in controversy of one
million dollars ($1,000,000) or more, designated in the pleadings for either jury or non-jury trials,
or involves an exclusive choice of court agreement or a judgment resulting from an exclusive choice
of court agreement, or is so designated by the presiding judge, qualifies for assignment to the
CCLC.
(2) Excluded cases include any case containing a claim for personal, physical or mental
injury; mortgage foreclosure actions; mechanics' lien actions; condemnation proceedings; and any
case involving an exclusive choice of court agreement where a party to the agreement is an
individual acting primarily for personal, family, or household purposes or where the agreement
relates to an individual or collective contract of employment.
(3) Any party may request a judicial conference to seek assignment to the CCLC, and
acceptance of any matter in addition to the sections listed in subsection (c)(1) of this section shall
be at the discretion of the judge(s) assigned to the calendar.
(d) Timing. All matters assigned to the CCLC shall be expedited. All memoranda from all
interested parties in a matter assigned to the calendar shall be completed within sixty (60) days of
the filing of the certified record. No continuances or postponements shall be granted except for
good cause shown. Such continuances as are necessary shall be granted for the shortest practicable
time.
(e) Use of section. Under no circumstances shall any party be permitted to utilize this
section as a basis for dismissal of an action, as this section is enacted for the benefit and
convenience of the superior court.
8-2-42. Court of chancery.
(a) There is hereby established, within the superior court but acting as a separate court, the
court of chancery. The court of chancery shall operate independently from the superior court. The
courts shall have jurisdiction to hear and determine all matters and causes in equity only, except as
otherwise agreed to by the parties or pursuant to the provisions of § 8-2-43(b).
(b) The court of chancery shall consist of five (5) chancellors. One chancellor shall be the
chief chancellor. Chancellors of the court of chancery shall be selected and appointed in the same
manner as magistrates of the superior court. Each chancellor shall be appointed for a term of ten
(10) years, with advice and consent of the senate.
LC005382 - Page 9 of 25

(c) The court of chancery shall not have jurisdiction to determine any matter wherein
monetary compensation is the exclusive or sole claim for relief.
(d) All jurisdiction and powers of the court of chancery may be exercised in chambers. The
court of chancery shall sit without juries.
(e) Upon a final determination of all equitable issues, the court of chancery shall transfer
any remaining matters to the appropriate trial court for resolution.
8-2-43. Jurisdiction of courts of chancery.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the courts of chancery shall hear
disputes in equity only. These may include matters involving fiduciary duty, mediation and
arbitration, governance, appraisal, books-and-records inspection demands, and other equitable or
statutorily assigned matters, business and technology disputes, and disputes involving deed
covenants or restrictions.
(b) Persons and entities may include provisions in their governing documents that designate
the court of chancery as the exclusive venue for resolving internal disputes and waive the right to
a jury trial for internal claims. Internal claims shall cover a broad scope of claims, including
derivative claims and allegations of breaches of fiduciary duty. A jury trial waiver shall be
enforceable even if the entity's members, owners, officers or governing persons did not individually
sign such waiver.
SECTION 7. Section 9-26-4.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 9-26 entitled "Levy and Sale
on Execution" is hereby amended to read as follows:
9-26-4.1. Homestead estate exemption.
(a) In addition to the property exempt from attachment as set forth in § 9-26-4, an estate of
homestead to the extent of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in the land and buildings, or
personal property that the owner uses as a residence, may be acquired pursuant to this section by
an owner of a home or an individual who rightfully possesses the premises by lease, as a life tenant,
as a beneficiary of a revocable or irrevocable trust or otherwise, and who occupies or intends to
occupy the home as his or her principal residence. Provided, effective July 1, 2026, the estate of
homestead for land, buildings, and personal property that the owner uses as a residence, shall be
unlimited in value, and such land and buildings and personal property shall be exempt from
attachment, levy on execution, and sale for payment of debts or legacies, except as provided for
otherwise in this section. The estate of homestead provided pursuant to this section shall be
automatic by operation of law, and without any requirement or necessity for the filing of a
declaration, a statement in a deed, or any other documentation. The estate shall be exempt from the
laws of attachment, levy on execution, and sale for payment of debts or legacies, except in the
LC005382 - Page 10 of 25

following cases:
(1) Sale for taxes, sewer liens, water liens, lighting district assessments, and fire district
assessments;
(2) For a debt contracted prior to the acquisition of the estate of homestead;
(3) For a debt contracted for the purchase of the home;
(4) Upon an order issued by the family court to enforce its judgment that a spouse pay a
certain amount weekly or otherwise for the support of a spouse or minor children;
(5) Where a building or buildings are situated on land not owned by the owner of a
homestead estate are attached, levied upon or sold for the ground rent of the lot upon which the
building or buildings are situated;
(6) For a debt due to, or a lien in favor of, the department of human services and/or the
state of Rhode Island for reimbursement of medical assistance, as provided for in § 40-8-15;
(7) For a debt heretofore or hereafter owing to a federally insured deposit-taking institution
or a person regulated or licensed under title 19.
(b) For the purposes of this section, “owner of a home” includes a sole owner, lessee (but
only a lessee who or that was the owner of a home prior to a transfer to the lessor), joint tenant,
tenant by the entirety, or tenant in common; provided, that only one individual may acquire an
estate of homestead in the home for the benefit of his or her family; and provided further, that an
estate of homestead may be acquired on only one principal residence for the benefit of a family.
For the purposes of this section, “family” includes either a parent and child or children, a husband
and wife and their children, if any, or a sole owner. The provisions of this section shall not apply
to any debt owing to a regulated institution, a debt secured by a mortgage or other voluntary lien
on a home, or a mechanics' lien on the property comprising the estate as provided for under chapter
28 of title 34. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, it shall not be necessary to record a
declaration of homestead in order to take advantage of the homestead estate exemption.
(c) An estate of homestead shall be subordinate to a mortgage encumbering the home that
was signed by all the owners of the home at the time of execution of said mortgage. A mortgage
executed by fewer than all of the owners of a home that is subject to an estate of homestead shall
be superior only to the homestead estate of the owners who are parties to the mortgage and their
non-titled spouses and minor children, if any.
(d) For purposes of this chapter, a mortgage shall include an instrument granting a security
interest in a manufactured home or cooperative housing unit. The subordination shall not require
the signature of a spouse who is not an owner. No statement that a homestead estate shall be
subordinate to the mortgage shall be required in the mortgage instrument and nothing contained in
LC005382 - Page 11 of 25

a mortgage or any document executed in connection with the mortgage shall affect or be construed
to create, modify, or terminate a homestead estate, other than to subordinate it to the mortgage as
aforesaid. A mortgage lender shall not require or record a release of homestead in connection with
the making and recording of a mortgage.
SECTION 8. Title 9 of the General Laws entitled "COURTS AND CIVIL PROCEDURE
— PROCEDURE GENERALLY" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 36
RHODE ISLAND RAPID ARBITRATION ACT
9-36-1. Definitions.
For purposes of this chapter only, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Agreement" means an agreement described in § 9-36-3 of this chapter.
(2) "Arbitration" means an arbitration conducted pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.
(3) "Arbitrator" means a person named in an agreement, selected under an agreement, or
appointed by the parties to an agreement or the court of chancery, to preside over an arbitration and
issue a final award. If an arbitration proceeds before more than one arbitrator:
(i) References in this chapter to an arbitrator shall be deemed to be references to the
arbitrators; and
(ii) Unless otherwise provided in an agreement, references in this chapter to an act of an
arbitrator shall be deemed to be references to an act of a majority of the arbitrators.
(4) "Business entity" means any corporation, association, partnership, or limited liability
company as organized under title 7 of the Rhode Island general laws.
(5) "Consumer" means an individual who seeks or acquires, by purchase or lease, any
goods or services for personal, family, or household purposes.
(6) "Final award" means an award designated as final and issued in an arbitration by an
arbitrator.
(7) "Organization" means a civic association, neighborhood alliance, homeowners
maintenance corporation, homeowners maintenance association, condominium association or other
similar entity charged with or assuming the duties of maintaining the public areas, open space, or
common facilities within a residential development or community.
9-36-2. Purpose of the chapter.
The purpose of this chapter is to provide Rhode Island business, corporate and nonprofit
entities a method by which the entities may resolve disputes in a prompt, cost-effective, and
efficient manner, through voluntary arbitration conducted by expert arbitrators, and to ensure rapid
resolution of those business disputes. This chapter is intended to provide an additional option by
LC005382 - Page 12 of 25

which sophisticated entities may resolve their disputes. Therefore, nothing in this chapter is
intended to impair the ability of entities to use other arbitral procedures of the entities choosing,
including procedures that afford lengthier proceedings and allow for more extensive discovery.
9-36-3. Effect of arbitration agreement.
(a) A written agreement to submit to arbitration any controversy existing at or arising after
the effective date of the agreement is valid, enforceable, and irrevocable, save upon grounds as
exist at law or in equity for the revocation of any contract, without regard to the justiciable character
of the controversy, as long as:
(1) The agreement is signed by the parties to an arbitration;
(2) At least one party to the agreement is an entity formed or organized under the laws of
this state or having its principal place of business in this state;
(3) No party to the agreement is a consumer;
(4) The agreement provides that it shall be governed by or construed under the laws of this
state, without regard to principles of conflict of laws, regardless of whether the laws of this state
govern the parties' other rights, remedies, liabilities, powers and duties; and
(5) The agreement includes an express reference to this chapter, the "Rhode Island rapid
arbitration act;"
(6) During the pendency of an arbitration, an agreement may be amended to alter the
procedures of the arbitration only with the approval of an arbitrator, but the agreement may not be
amended in order to alter the time set forth in § 9-36-8(b).
(b) A party to an agreement is deemed to have waived objection and consented to:
(1) The arbitration procedures set forth in this chapter;
(2) The submission exclusively to an arbitrator of issues of substantive and procedural
arbitrability;
(3) The exclusive personal and subject matter jurisdiction of an arbitration, with venue
waived as long as the hearing is conducted within this state;
(4) The exclusive personal and subject matter jurisdiction of the courts of the state for the
limited purposes set forth in § 9-36-4; and
(5) Except as otherwise limited by the agreement, an arbitrator's power and authority to:
(i) Determine in the first instance the scope of the arbitrator's remedial authority, subject
to review solely pursuant to the provisions of § 9-36-9; and
(ii) Grant relief, including to award any legal or equitable remedy appropriate in the sole
judgment of the arbitrator.
(c) A party to an agreement is deemed to have waived the right to:
LC005382 - Page 13 of 25

(1) Seek to enjoin an arbitration;
(2) Remove any action subject to the provisions of this chapter to a federal court;
(3) Appeal or challenge an interim ruling or order of an arbitrator;
(4) Appeal or challenge a final award, except under § 9-36-9; and
(5) Challenge whether an arbitration has been properly held, except pursuant to the
provisions of § 9-36-9.
9-36-4. Jurisdiction.
(a) Jurisdiction of the supreme court. Except as otherwise provided in an arbitration
agreement, the consummation of the arbitration agreement confers jurisdiction on the supreme
court to hear only a challenge to a final award under § 9-36-9. The supreme court shall not have
jurisdiction to hear appeals of:
(1) The appointment of an arbitrator under § 9-36-5;
(2) The determination of an arbitrator's fees under § 9-36-6(b);
(3) The issuance or denial of an injunction in aid of arbitration under subsection (b)(5) of
this section; and
(4) The grant or denial of an order enforcing a subpoena issued under §9-36-7(b).
(b) A party to any agreement shall be deemed to have waived the right to such appeals. The
supreme court, in consultation with the court of chancery, may publish rules for arbitration
proceedings under this chapter and, unless an agreement provides for different rules, may specify
that those rules govern arbitration proceedings under this chapter.
(c) Jurisdiction of the court of chancery. The making of an agreement confers jurisdiction
on the court of chancery only to:
(1) Appoint an arbitrator under § 9-36-5;
(2) Enter judgment under § 9-36-10(b);
(3) Upon the request of an arbitrator, enforce a subpoena issued under § 9-36-7(b);
(4) Determine an arbitrator's fees under § 9-36-6(b); and
(5) Issue, only before an arbitrator accepts appointment, an injunction in aid of an
arbitration; provided that, the injunction may not divest the arbitrator of jurisdiction or authority.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, no court has jurisdiction to enjoin an arbitration under this chapter.
The court of chancery may promulgate rules to govern proceedings under this chapter.
(d) Jurisdiction of the superior court. The consummation of an arbitration agreement
confers jurisdiction on the superior court only to enter judgment under § 9-36-10(c).
9-36-5. Appointment of arbitrator by the court of chancery.
(a) The court of chancery, on petition or on application of a party in an existing case, has
LC005382 - Page 14 of 25

exclusive jurisdiction to appoint one or more arbitrators upon:
(1) The consent of all parties to an agreement;
(2) The failure or inability of an arbitrator named in or selected under an agreement to serve
as an arbitrator;
(3) The failure of an arbitration agreement to name an arbitrator or to provide a method for
selecting an arbitrator;
(4) The inability of the parties to an agreement to appoint an arbitrator; or
(5) The failure of a procedure set forth in an arbitration agreement for selecting an
arbitrator.
(b) Following the petition or application, each party shall propose to the court of chancery
no more than three (3) persons that are qualified and willing to serve as an arbitrator.
(c)(1) The court of chancery shall, within thirty (30) days of the service of the petition or
application, appoint an arbitrator and, in so doing, may take into account:
(i) The terms of an agreement;
(ii) The persons proposed by the parties; and
(iii) Reports made under § 9-36-6(d).
(2) An arbitrator appointed by the court of chancery may only be:
(i) A person named in or selected under the arbitration agreement;
(ii) An expert in any nonlegal discipline described in the arbitration agreement; or
(iii) A member in good standing of the bar of the supreme court for at least ten (10) years.
(d) An arbitrator so appointed has all the powers of an arbitrator specifically named in an
agreement. Unless otherwise provided in an agreement, the court of chancery shall appoint a single
arbitrator.
9-36-6. Arbitrator fees and expenses of arbitration.
(a) A person accepting an appointment as an arbitrator shall:
(1) Consent to the terms of this chapter; and
(2)(i) Accept the consequences set forth in subsection (b) of this section for failing to
comply with the provisions of § 9-36-8(b).
(ii) An arbitrator is immune from civil liability for or resulting from any act or omission
done or made in connection with an arbitration, unless the arbitrator's act or omission was made or
done in bad faith, with malicious intent, or in a manner exhibiting a willful, wanton disregard of
the rights, safety, or property of another.
(b) Unless otherwise provided in an agreement, an arbitrator's fees and expenses, together
with other expenses incurred in the conduct of an arbitration, but not including counsel fees of
LC005382 - Page 15 of 25

parties to the arbitration, shall be borne as provided in a final award. Notwithstanding the foregoing,
an arbitrator that fails to issue a final award in compliance with §9-36-8(b) is not entitled to full
payment of the arbitrator's fees. The arbitrator's fees shall be reduced by twenty-five percent (25%)
if the final award is less than thirty (30) days late; the arbitrator's fees shall be reduced by seventy-
five percent (75%) if the final award is between thirty (30) and sixty (60) days late; and the
arbitrator's fees shall be reduced by one hundred percent (100%) if the final award is more than
sixty (60) days late; provided, however, upon petition by an arbitrator, the court of chancery may
summarily determine, on clear and convincing evidence, that exceptional circumstances exist such
that the reductions in fee provided in this subsection should be modified or eliminated.
(c) An arbitrator may retain appropriate counsel, in consultation with the parties. The
arbitrator's counsel may make rulings on issues of law, to the extent requested to do so by the
arbitrator, which shall have the same effect as a ruling by the arbitrator, if the arbitrator so
determines. The fees and expenses incurred by the arbitrator's counsel shall be included in the
arbitrator's expenses described in subsection (b) of this section.
(d) An arbitrator that fails to issue a final award in compliance with § 9-36-8(b) shall,
within ninety (90) days of the failure, report that failure to the clerk of the court of chancery,
indicating:
(1) The date on which the arbitrator accepted appointment as an arbitrator; and
(2) The date on which the final award was issued.
9-36-7. Hearing -- Witnesses -- Prehearing evidence gathering -- Rulings before final
award.
(a) Unless otherwise provided in an arbitration agreement, an arbitrator shall appoint a time
and place for a hearing or an adjourned hearing, either of which shall be held within the state unless
otherwise provided in an agreement. A party to an arbitration is entitled to be heard, to present
evidence relevant to the arbitration, and to cross-examine witnesses appearing at a hearing.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, an arbitrator may make such interim rulings and issue such interim
orders as the arbitrator deems necessary to determine what evidence and which witnesses may be
presented at the hearing, including to limit the presentation of evidence and witnesses as necessary
to satisfy § 9-36-8(b). An arbitrator may resolve an arbitration on the evidence produced at a
hearing notwithstanding the failure of a party duly notified to appear or participate at the hearing.
(b) Unless otherwise provided in an agreement, an arbitrator has the power to administer
oaths and may order the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, records, contracts,
papers, accounts, and all other documents and evidence under the control or in the possession of
the parties to the arbitration. Only if provided in the arbitration agreement, shall an arbitrator have
LC005382 - Page 16 of 25

the power to issue subpoenas, and all provisions of law compelling a person under subpoena to
testify are applicable. Only if provided in the arbitration agreement, shall an arbitrator award
commissions to permit a deposition to be taken, in the manner and on the terms designated by the
arbitrator, of a witness who cannot be subpoenaed to appeal for the arbitration hearing.
(c) An arbitrator may make such rulings, including rulings of law, and issue such orders or
impose such sanctions as the arbitrator deems proper to resolve an arbitration in a timely, efficient,
and orderly manner.
9-36-8. Awards.
(a) A final award shall be in writing and signed by an arbitrator, shall be provided to each
party to an arbitration, and shall include a form of judgment for entry under § 9-36-10. Unless
otherwise provided in an agreement, an arbitrator may make any award, whether legal or equitable
in nature, deemed appropriate by the arbitrator. Unless otherwise provided in an arbitration
agreement, an arbitrator may make in a final award rulings on any issue of law that the arbitrator
considers relevant to an arbitration.
(b) Subject to subsection (c) of this section, an arbitrator shall issue a final award within
the time fixed by an agreement or, if not so fixed, within one hundred twenty (120) days of the
arbitrator's acceptance of the arbitrator's appointment.
(c) Parties to an arbitration may extend the time for the final award by unanimous consent
in writing either before or after the expiration of that time, but the extension may not exceed,
whether singly or in the aggregate, sixty (60) days after the expiration of the period set by
subsection (b) of this section.
9-36-9. Challenges -- Court powers to vacate, modify, or correct a final award.
(a) An appeal to a final award may be taken to the supreme court in the manner as appeals
are taken from orders or judgments in a civil action.
(b) An appeal to a final award shall be taken within fifteen (15) days of the issuance of the
final award.
(c) In an appeal of a final award, the supreme court may only vacate, modify, or correct the
final award in conformity with the Federal Arbitration Act, 9 U.S.C. §§ 1-16; 9 U.S.C. §§ 201-208;
9 U.S.C. §§ 301-307. The supreme court shall have the authority to order confirmation of a final
award, which confirmation shall be deemed to be confirmation under § 9-36-10(a).
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, an agreement may provide for:
(1) No appellate review of a final award; or
(2) Appellate review of a final award by one or more arbitrators, in which case appellate
review shall proceed as provided in the agreement. An appellate arbitrator may be appointed by the
LC005382 - Page 17 of 25

court of chancery of the state under § 9-36-5. An appellate arbitrator shall have authority to order
confirmation of a final award, which confirmation shall be deemed to be confirmation under § 9-
36-10(a).
9-36-10. Confirmation of a final award -- Judgment on final award.
(a) Unless an appeal is taken under § 9-36-9 or unless an agreement provides for appellate
review by one or more arbitrators, a final award, without further action by the court of chancery of
the state, is deemed to have been confirmed by the court of chancery on the fifth business day
following the period for appeal under § 9-36-9(b). If an agreement provides for no appellate review
of a final award, the final award is deemed to have been so confirmed on the fifth business day
following the award's issuance.
(b) Except for a final award solely for money damages, upon application to the court of
chancery by a party to an arbitration in which a final award has been confirmed under subsection
(a) of this section, the court of chancery shall promptly enter a final judgment in conformity with
that final award. A final judgment, so entered, has the same effect as if rendered in an action by the
court of chancery.
(c) If a final award is solely for money damages, upon application to the superior court by
a party to an arbitration in which a final award has been confirmed under subsection (a) of this
section, the clerk of the superior court shall promptly enter a judgment on the judgment docket in
conformity with that final award. The clerk of the superior court shall enter in the judgment docket
the names of the parties, the amount of the final award, the time from which interest, if any, runs,
and the amount of the costs, with the true date of the filing and entry. A final judgment, so entered,
has the same force and effect as if rendered in an action at law, and, from that date, and may be
perfected as a lien on all the real estate of the debtor, in the same manner and as fully as judgments
rendered in the superior court are perfected as liens, and may be executed and enforced in the same
way as judgments of the superior court.
9-36-11. Application of chapter.
It is the policy of this chapter to give maximum effect to the principle of freedom of
contract and to the enforceability of agreements.
9-36-12. Short title.
This chapter may be cited as the "Rhode Island Rapid Arbitration Act."
SECTION 9. Chapter 18-1 of the General Laws entitled "Application of Laws to Trusts"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
18-1-6. Additional provisions governing trusts.
(a) Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary in this title 18 ("Fiduciaries"), the
LC005382 - Page 18 of 25

following provisions shall apply to any trusts formed under the provisions of this chapter, effective
July 1, 2026.
(1) Trustees may allocate trustees' duties to different parties, in order to allow family
members or trusted advisors to retain control of investment and distribution decisions.
(2) Trusts may last for up to one thousand (1,000) years as so-called "dynasty trusts."
(3) Individuals inside or outside of Rhode Island may serve as trust protectors and trust
advisors through entities including LLCs, without any requirement to register with any Rhode
Island government entity.
(4) Private settlement of trust matters without court supervision is permitted.
(5) Holders of general powers of appointment, parents/guardians, or persons with
substantially similar interests may represent minor, unborn, or remainder beneficiaries.
(6) Claims based on forced heirship, protecting beneficiaries whose families reside in
forced heirship jurisdictions, are hereinafter prohibited.
(7) Trusts shall not be required to register and shall not be required to make any trust
documents publicly available, and there shall be automatically sealed any trust-related judicial
proceedings unless specifically ordered otherwise by a court of competent jurisdiction.
(8) No contest or in terrorem clauses shall be generally presumed valid, without common
exceptions.
(9) Self-settled or "domestic asset protection" trusts are recognized as permissible; and
(10) Beneficiary notice requirements may be modified or eliminated by the trust document,
creating so-called "silent" or "quiet" trusts.
SECTION 10. Section 44-11-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-11 entitled "Business
Corporation Tax" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-11-2. Imposition of tax.
(a) Each corporation shall annually pay to the state a tax equal to nine percent (9%) of net
income, as defined in § 44-11-11, qualified in § 44-11-12, and apportioned to this state as provided
in §§ 44-11-13 — 44-11-15, for the taxable year. For tax years beginning on or after January 1,
2015, each corporation shall annually pay to the state a tax equal to seven percent (7.0%) of net
income, as defined in § 44-11-13 — 44-11-15, for the taxable year.
(b) A corporation shall pay the amount of any tax as computed in accordance with
subsection (a) after deducting from “net income,” as used in this section, fifty percent (50%) of the
excess of capital gains over capital losses realized during the taxable year, if for the taxable year:
(1) The corporation is engaged in buying, selling, dealing in, or holding securities on its
own behalf and not as a broker, underwriter, or distributor;
LC005382 - Page 19 of 25

(2) Its gross receipts derived from these activities during the taxable year amounted to at
least ninety percent (90%) of its total gross receipts derived from all of its activities during the year.
“Gross receipts” means all receipts, whether in the form of money, credits, or other valuable
consideration, received during the taxable year in connection with the conduct of the taxpayer's
activities.
(c) A corporation shall not pay the amount of the tax computed on the basis of its net
income under subsection (a), but shall annually pay to the state a tax equal to ten cents ($.10) for
each one hundred dollars ($100) of gross income for the taxable year or a tax of one hundred dollars
($100), whichever tax shall be the greater, if for the taxable year the corporation is either a “personal
holding company” registered under the federal Investment Company Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. § 80a-
1 et seq., “regulated investment company,” or a “real estate investment trust” as defined in the
federal income tax law applicable to the taxable year. “Gross income” means gross income as
defined in the federal income tax law applicable to the taxable year, plus:
(1) Any interest not included in the federal gross income; minus
(2) Interest on obligations of the United States or its possessions, and other interest exempt
from taxation by this state; and minus
(3) Fifty percent (50%) of the excess of capital gains over capital losses realized during the
taxable year.
(d)(1) A small business corporation having an election in effect under subchapter S, 26
U.S.C. § 1361 et seq., shall not be subject to the Rhode Island income tax on corporations, except
that the corporation shall be subject to the provisions of subsection (a), to the extent of the income
that is subjected to federal tax under subchapter S. Effective for tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2015, a small business corporation having an election in effect under subchapter S, 26
U.S.C. § 1361 et seq., shall be subject to the minimum tax under § 44-11-2(e).
(2) The shareholders of the corporation who are residents of Rhode Island shall include in
their income their proportionate share of the corporation's federal taxable income.
(3) [Deleted by P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 29, § 1.]
(4) [Deleted by P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 29, § 1.]
(e) Minimum tax. The tax imposed upon any corporation under this section, including a
small business corporation having an election in effect under subchapter S, 26 U.S.C. § 1361 et
seq., shall not be less than four hundred fifty dollars ($450). For tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2017, the tax imposed shall not be less than four hundred dollars ($400). Provided, for
tax years beginning after July 1, 2026, the minimum tax provided for under this subsection shall be
eliminated.
LC005382 - Page 20 of 25

SECTION 11. Title 44 of the General Laws entitled "TAXATION" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 12.1
FRANCHISE TAX
44-12.1-1. Tax imposed.
(a) Every corporation, joint-stock company, limited liability company, partnership,
statutory trusts or association incorporated in this state or qualified to do business in this state,
whether or not doing business for profit, shall pay an annual franchise tax to the state.
(b) The franchise tax established herein shall be a minimum of four hundred fifty dollars
($450) for all noncorporation entities to include limited liability companies, partnerships, and
statutory trusts.
(c) The franchise tax for corporations shall be based upon the number of shares issued, as
follows:
(1) For a corporation with five thousand (5,000) authorized shares or less, the franchise tax
shall be four hundred fifty dollars ($450);
(2) For a corporation with five thousand one (5,001) and up to ten thousand (10,000)
authorized shares, the franchise tax shall be seven hundred fifty dollars ($750);
(3) For a corporation with ten thousand one (10,001) authorized shares or more, the
franchise tax shall be one thousand dollars ($1,000);
44-12.1-2. Filing of returns -- Contents.
Every entity subject to the provisions of this chapter shall, on or before March 15, annually,
file with the tax administrator as of the last day of its next preceding taxable year a return, under
oath or affirmation, signed by its treasurer or by an authorized officer or agent of the entity, if
organized, and if not organized, under oath of someone authorized to act by the entity, containing
information as the tax administrator may require, including:
(1) The name of the entity and the location of its principal office.
(2) The amount of its capital stock authorized, and the par value thereof, if applicable.
(3) The amount of its capital stock authorized, without par value, if applicable.
44-12.1-3. Valuation of no-par stock.
In the case of corporations having capital stock of no-par value, one hundred dollars ($100)
per share shall be deemed to be the par value for the purposes of this chapter.
44-12.1-4. Assessment of tax – Notice of amount.
The tax administrator, as soon as possible after the filing of the return, shall assess, as of
the last day of its next preceding taxable year, a tax upon each entity as provided in this chapter
LC005382 - Page 21 of 25

and shall mail a notice of the amount of the tax to each entity, but failure to receive the notice shall
not invalidate the tax or excuse the nonpayment of the tax.
44-12.1-4.1. Hearing by tax administrator on application.
Any entity aggrieved by the action of the tax administrator in determining the amount of
any tax or penalty imposed under the provisions of this chapter may apply to the tax administrator,
in writing, within thirty (30) days after the notice of the action is mailed to it, for a hearing relative
thereto. The tax administrator shall fix a time and place for the hearing and shall so notify the
applicant. At the hearing, the tax administrator shall correct manifest errors, if any, disclosed at the
hearing and assess and collect the lawfully due tax together with any penalty or interest on the tax.
44-12.1-5. Payment of tax -- Collection powers.
The tax shall be payable at the earlier of March 15 or within fifteen (15) days after its
assessment and, if not paid when due, shall bear interest from the date of its assessment at the
annual rate provided by § 44-1-7 until paid. The tax administrator shall receive and collect the taxes
so assessed in the same manner and with the same powers as are prescribed for, and given to,
collectors of taxes by chapters 7 through 9 of this title.
44-12.1-5.1. Claims for refund -- Hearing upon denial.
(a) Any entity subject to the provisions of this chapter may file a claim for refund with the
tax administrator at any time within two (2) years after the tax has been paid. If the tax administrator
shall determine that the tax has been overpaid, the administrator shall make a refund with interest
at the annual rate provided by § 44-1-7.1 from the date of overpayment.
(b) Any entity whose claim for refund has been denied may, within thirty (30) days from
the date of the mailing by the tax administrator of the notice of the decision, request a hearing, and
the tax administrator shall, as soon as practicable, set a time and place for the hearing and shall
notify the applicant.
44-12.1-6. Penalty for failure to make return.
If the return that is required to be made by § 44-12.1-2 is not made within the time fixed
by this chapter, the officer or agent neglecting or refusing to make the return shall be fined not
exceeding five hundred dollars ($500).
44-12.1-7. Lien on real estate.
The tax shall from the date of assessment become a lien upon the real estate of the entity
liable for the tax until the tax is collected.
44-12.1-8. Forfeiture of charter or articles for nonpayment of tax.
The tax administrator may, after July 15 of each year, make up a list of all entities which
have failed to pay any franchise tax assessed for two (2) years after the tax became due and payable,
LC005382 - Page 22 of 25

shall certify to the correctness of the list, and shall file the list as a public record in the office of the
secretary of state. Upon the filing of the certified list, the charter, articles of organization, or articles
of association of each of the entities shall become forfeited by reason of the failure to pay the tax,
and all the entities shall cease to be bodies corporate, except as provided in § 7-1.2-1324. The
secretary of state shall mail a notice of the forfeiture of charter or articles to each entity at its last
known address, but failure to receive the notice shall not invalidate the forfeiture. Any entity or any
stockholder, officer, manager or agent of the entity, continuing to act thereafter under any forfeited
charter or articles, except as provided in § 7-1.2-1324, or pending an appeal from the forfeiture as
provided, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not less than
fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense.
44-12.1-9. Publication of forfeitures -- Vacation on payment of tax.
The secretary of state shall publish on the secretary of state's website the names of all
entities whose charters or articles have been forfeited. The forfeiture shall be vacated as to any
entity, which shall pay all taxes and all interest then due to the tax administrator within sixty (60)
days of the date of the publication.
44-12.1-10. Appeal of forfeitures.
Any entity, by any stockholder, equity owner, manager or officer of the entity, aggrieved
by the forfeiture of the charter or articles of the entity may appeal from the forfeiture, within thirty
(30) days from the date of the publication, to the sixth division of the district court, and the court
shall proceed as soon as possible to hear the appeal after the manner of equitable causes. If the
appellant shall show to the satisfaction of the court that the forfeiture of the charter or articles of
the entity was erroneous under the provisions, or that the tax assessed was improper or erroneous
in whole or in part, and in that case if the appellant shall pay all taxes and all interest then due under
this chapter, then the court shall sustain the appeal and shall vacate the forfeiture as to the appellant
entity. Upon failure to show error in the forfeiture under the provisions, or to pay all taxes and all
interest due, the court shall dismiss the appeal and confirm the forfeiture. Upon the sustaining of
the appeal of any entity, the clerk of the district court shall, within ten (10) days, file with the
secretary of state and with the division of taxation an attested copy of the decree vacating the
forfeiture as to the appellant entity. A party aggrieved by a final order of the court may seek review
in the supreme court by writ of certiorari in accordance with the procedures contained in section
42-35-16.
44-12.1-11. Corporations exempt.
The provisions of this section shall not apply to the following entities: Roger Williams
General Hospital, Women and Infants Hospital of Rhode Island, Rhode Island Hospital, St. Joseph's
LC005382 - Page 23 of 25

Hospital, Butler Hospital, Newport Hospital, South County Hospital, Lincoln School, St. George's
School, the Mary C. Wheeler School, Incorporated, insurance or surety companies, corporations
mentioned in §§ 7-6-4, 27-25-1, and 44-13-4, and all corporations exempt by charter or by the law
of this state.
44-12.1-12. Declarations under penalty of perjury.
The oath or affirmation required by this chapter as to any report or written statement shall
not be required if the report or statement to be sworn to contains or is verified by a written
declaration that it is made under the penalties of perjury; and whoever signs or issues any report or
statement containing or verified by a written declaration shall, if the report or statement is willfully
false, be guilty of perjury.
44-12.1-13. Appeals -- Interest on refunds.
Appeals from administrative orders or decisions made pursuant to any provisions of this
chapter shall be to the sixth division district court pursuant to chapter 8 of title 8. The taxpayer's
right to appeal shall be expressly made conditional upon prepayment of all taxes, interest, and
penalties unless the taxpayer moves for and is granted an exemption from the prepayment
requirement pursuant to § 8-8-26. If the court, after appeal, holds that the taxpayer is entitled to a
refund, the taxpayer shall also be paid interest on the amount at the rate provided in § 44-1-7.1.
SECTION 12. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005382
========
LC005382 - Page 24 of 25